Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2810
Chart order, defined.

Chart order means an order for a drug or device issued by a practitioner for a patient who is in the hospital or long-term care facility where the chart is stored or for a patient receiving detoxification treatment or maintenance treatment pursuant to section 28-412. Chart order does not include a prescription and may not be used to authorize dispensing of a controlled substance to a patient in a long-term care facility.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 906;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 32.